Colorado statutes. TITLE 31 Government - Municipal
PART 3
PAYMENTS OF MATURED SPECIAL ASSESSMENT

31-21-301. Power to issue bonds - purpose.

Subject to the provisions of this part 3, any municipality has the power to issue its negotiable coupon bonds for the purpose of paying any special assessment bonds or obligations which it may issue, together with interest thereon, when it appears that there is not or will not be sufficient money for the payment of the same at maturity in the particular fund out of which payment should be made.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1141, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-301 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-302. Ordinance - taxes - interest - disposition.

The issuance of any bonds in accordance with this part 3 shall be authorized by an ordinance, subject to and otherwise in accordance with the provisions of section 31-15-302 (1)(d). Such bonds shall bear interest at a rate and shall be exchanged or sold at a price such that the net effective interest rate of the issue of bonds does not exceed the maximum net effective interest rate authorized. Interest shall be paid semiannually at such place, in such denominations, and by such officers as may be prescribed in such ordinance. Such bonds may be exchanged for outstanding matured and overdue special assessment bonds or obligations and interest thereon, or they may be sold and the proceeds thereof used for the purpose specified in this part 3.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-303 as it existed prior to 1975.

31-21-303. Construction - disposition of delinquent assessment.

Nothing in this part 3 shall release or discharge any special assessment which is a lien on or against any property. Any municipality issuing bonds under this part 3 shall be subrogated to the rights of the holders or owners of the outstanding special assessment bonds or obligations paid. If, after the issuance of bonds authorized by this part 3, the delinquent or defaulted special assessments, or any part thereof, are collected and the special assessment bonds or obligations payable out of the particular special assessment fund have been redeemed by means of bonds issued under this part 3, the amounts so collected shall be used to pay the principal of and the interest on the bonds authorized and the tax levies therefor shall be reduced in a like manner.

Source:

L. 75:

Entire title R&RE, p. 1142, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 31-21-304 as it existed prior to 1975.